Wisconsin, session 2025, SB921.
do enact as follows:SB921,13Section 1. 118.33 (1) (a) 1. f. of the statutes is amended to read:SB921,2,81118.33 (1) (a) 1. f. At least 0.5 credit of personal financial literacy that 2includes financial mindset, education and employment, money management, 3saving and investing, credit and debt, and risk management and insurance. The 4school board shall award a pupil 0.5 credit of personal financial literacy for 5successfully completing in the high school grades a financial literacy program 6offered by a financial institution, as defined in s. 214.01 (1) (jn), through a branch 7that is located in a school if the school board determines that the financial literacy 8program satisfies the personal financial literacy requirement under this subd. 1. f.SB921,2,99